Wyoming, session 2025, HB0010.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 35-11-401(e)(vi)(intro), (B) through
(D), (F), by creating new subparagraphs (H) and (J), (j)
HB0010

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0001
and (k) by creating new paragraphs (viii) and (ix),
35-11-417(e) and 35-11-423(b) are amended to read:

35-11-401. Compliance generally; exceptions.

(e) The provisions of this article shall not apply to
any of the following activities:

(vi) Limited mining operations, whether
commercial or noncommercial, for the removal of sand,
gravel, scoria, limestone, dolomite, shale, ballast or
feldspar any noncoal mineral, except minerals regulated by
the United States nuclear regulatory commission and
minerals regulated by the state under article 20 of this
chapter, from an area of fifteen (15) acres or less of
affected land, excluding roads used to access the mining
operation, if the operator has written permission for the
operation from the owner and lessee, if any, of the
surface. The operator shall notify the land quality
division of the department of environmental quality and the
inspector of mines within the department of workforce
services of the location of the land to be mined and the
postal address of the operator at least thirty (30) days
HB0010

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0001
before commencing operations. A copy of the notice shall
also be mailed to all surface owners located within one (1)
mile of the proposed boundary of the limited mining
operation at least thirty (30) days before commencing
operations. The operator shall notify the land quality
division of the department of environmental quality of the
date of commencement of limited mining operations within
thirty (30) days of commencing operations. Limited mining
operations authorized under this paragraph are subject to
the following:

(B) Before commencing any limited mining
operations, the operator shall file a bond to insure
reclamation in accordance with the purposes of this act and
the following:

(I) For operations for the removal of
sand, gravel, scoria, dolomite, shale, ballast or feldspar
that commence operations:

(1) Before July 1, 2025, the
operator shall file a bond in the amount of two thousand
HB0010

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0001
dollars ($2,000.00) per acre, except of affected land,
including roads used to access the mining operation;

(2) On and after July 1, 2025, the
operator shall file a bond in the amount of five thousand
dollars ($5,000.00) per acre of affected land, including
roads used to access the mining operation.

(II) For quarries for which commencing
operations before July 1, 2025, the bond amount shall not
exceed three thousand dollars ($3,000.00) per acre of
affected land, including roads used to access the mining
operation;.

(III) For quarries commencing
operations on and after July 1, 2025, the bond amount shall
not exceed seven thousand dollars ($7,000.00) per acre of
affected land, including roads used to access the mining
operation;

(IV) For limited mining operations
specified in subdivisions (I) through (III) of this
HB0010

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0001
subparagraph, the operator may file a full-cost bond to
insure reclamation in accordance with W.S. 35-11-417;

(V) All other noncoal limited mining
operations shall file a full-cost bond to insure
reclamation in accordance with W.S. 35-11-417;

(VI) Within ninety (90) one hundred
fifty (150) days after limited mining operations commence,
the administrator may require the operator to post an
additional bond per acre of affected land if he determines
that such amount is necessary to insure reclamation. The
operator shall post the additional bond not later than
thirty (30) forty-five (45) days after receipt of such
notification.;

(C) After the limited mining operations
have ceased, the operator shall notify the administrator of
such that fact in the operator's next annual report and
commence plan for commencement of reclamation and
restoration within forty-five (45) days and in compliance
with the rules and regulations of the land quality division
of the department of environmental quality. The rules and
HB0010

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0001
regulations for reclamation shall at all times be
reasonable;

(D) Immediate reclamation will shall not be
required for limited mining operations for the removal of
any noncoal mineral, except minerals regulated by the
United States nuclear regulatory commission and minerals
regulated by the state under article 20 of this chapter, if
the landowner advises the department in writing of his
intent to further utilize the product of the mine, and if
he assumes the obligation of reclamation;

(F) Limited mining operations may continue
for not more than five (5) years from the date of
commencing operations unless a notification to extend
operations is submitted to the land quality division
administrator. Operators shall submit a notification of
extension for every subsequent five (5) year period with
the annual report required under subsection (k) of this
section;

(H) For noncoal minerals authorized for
limited mining operations under this paragraph, except for
HB0010

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0001
sand, gravel, scoria, limestone, dolomite, shale, ballast
and feldspar, the limited mining operations shall be:

(I) Only for purposes of proving or
evaluating a mineral deposit for subsequent mining
operations;

(II) Conducted using only mechanical
mining methods.

(J) No operator commencing or engaging in
limited mining operations under this paragraph shall:

(I) Conduct more than one (1) limited
mining operation within adjacent areas when the limited
mining operations are to mine the same mineral; or

(II) Conduct more than one (1) limited
mining operation within any six (6) mile radius when the
limited mining operations are to mine the same mineral. The
administrator may allow two (2) limited mining operations
for the same mineral within the six (6) mile radius if one
HB0010

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0001
(1) of the limited mining operations has completed all
required reclamation work and the bond has been released.

(j) The council, upon recommendation from the
advisory board through the administrator and director, may
modify or suspend certain requirements of W.S.
35-11-406(a), (b)(i) through (xx), (d), (f) and (g) by
rules and regulations, for surface mining operations
involving not more than thirty-five thousand (35,000) yards
of overburden, excluding topsoil, and ten (10) acres of
affected land in any one (1) year, if the application
requirements ensure reclamation in accordance with the
purposes of this act. Roads used to access a mining
operation permitted under this section shall be excluded
from the annual ten (10) acres of affected land limit, but
shall be included in the permit and bonded for reclamation
liability. Mining operations authorized and approved under
this subsection before July 1, 2025 are authorized to
continue operations, subject to any conditions imposed upon
the approval and in compliance with the rules promulgated
under this section. On and after July 1, 2025, no
applications submitted for operations under this subsection
shall be approved.
HB0010

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0001

(k) An operator conducting operations pursuant to
W.S. 35-11-401(e)(vi) shall file an annual report with the
administrator on or within thirty (30) days prior to the
anniversary date of the commencement date of initial
operation. The report shall contain:

(viii) The number of yards or tons of mineral
sold from the limited mining operations during the past
year;

(ix) If the operator is requesting a renewal to
continue for up to an additional five (5) years, evidence
that the limited mining operations will continue beyond the
initial five (5) year period, which includes but is not
limited to any of the following:

(A) A mineral supply contract within the
renewal period;

(B) A government project that is scheduled
to begin within the next renewal period;

HB0010

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0001
(C) A major industrial project that is
scheduled to begin within the next renewal period;

(D) Evidence that the operations are active
and had commercial sales within the last annual reporting
period;

(E) Evidence that a valid surface and
mineral owner consent, contract or lease extends through or
beyond the five (5) year renewal term;

(F) Evidence that the limited mining
operations site is under reclamation;

(G) Any other evidence specified by rule.

35-11-417. Bonding provisions.

(e) When the reclamation plan for any affected land
has been completed, the administrator may recommend to the
director the release of up to seventy-five percent (75%) of
the bond required for that affected land. The remaining
portion of the bond shall be not less than ten thousand
HB0010

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0001
dollars ($10,000.00), and shall be held for a period of at
least five (5) years after the date of reduction to assure
proper revegetation and restoration of groundwater. The
retained portion of the bond may be returned to the
operator at an earlier date if a release signed by the
surface owner and approved by the administrator and
director is obtained. For limited mining operations
authorized under W.S. 35-11-401(e)(vi), the administrator
may, after consultation with any affected surface owner,
recommend to the director the release of the bond after two
(2) successful growing seasons that establish permanent
vegetative cover.

35-11-423. Release of bonds.

(b) The retained portion of the bond may be returned
to the operator at an earlier date if a release signed by
the surface owner and approved by the administrator is
obtained. For limited mining operations authorized under
W.S. 35-11-401(e)(vi), the bond may, after consultation
with any affected surface owner, be released after two (2)
successful growing seasons that establish permanent
vegetative cover.
HB0010

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0001

Section 2. The environmental quality council, upon
recommendation by the department of environmental quality,
shall promulgate all rules necessary to implement this act.

Section 3.

(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective immediately upon completion
of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided
by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution.

(b) Section 1 of this act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0010